Colorado statutes. TITLE 40 Utilities
ARTICLE 3.4
EMERGENCY TELEPHONE ACCESS

40-3.4-101 to 40-3.4-111. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article repealed, (SB 13-194), ch. 89, p. 289, § 1, effective April 1.

Editor's note:

This article was added in 1986. For amendments to this article prior to its repeal in 2013, consult the 2012 Colorado Revised Statutes and the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

Cross references:

For the wind up of the low-income telephone assistance fund and the satisfying of obligations, see section 5 of chapter 89, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.